Washington statutes.
RCW 11.76.245

Procedure when claim made after time limitation.

After any time limitation prescribed in RCW 11.76.220, 11.76.240 or 11.76.243, the absentee claimant may, at any time, if the assets of the estate have not been claimed under the provisions of RCW 11.76.240 and 11.76.243, notify the department of revenue of his or her claim to the estate, and file in the court which had jurisdiction of the original probate a petition claiming the assets of the estate. The department of revenue may appear in answer to such petition. Upon proof being made to the probate court that the claimant is entitled to the estate assets, the court shall render its judgment to that effect and the assets shall be paid to the claimant without interest, upon appropriation made by the legislature.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2077; 1975 1st ex.s. c 278 s 12; 1965 c 145 s 11.76.245. Prior: 1955 ex.s. c 7 s 8.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 278: See notes following RCW 11.08.160.